Louisiana, session 2026, HB754.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:804(A) through (E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§804. Lake Catherine and Lake Pontchartrain Sanctuary Sanctuaries
A.(1) There is hereby created the Lake Catherine and Lake Pontchartrain
Sanctuary for fish, shrimp, and other seafood and marine life, to be comprised of the
waters of Lake Catherine, and its passes, the Rigolets, Unknown Pass, and Chef
Menteur, and that portion of Lake Pontchartrain as follows: the whole area from
where the Rigolets and Chef Menteur Passes enter Lake Pontchartrain extending in
a westerly direction to a point one and one-quarter miles west of the Southern
Railway Bridge, being all of Lake Pontchartrain and its tributaries lying east of the
Southern Railway Bridge, and all that portion of Lake Pontchartrain extending out
one and one-quarter miles from shore along the Orleans Parish shoreline to the
Jefferson-Orleans Parish line, and that area of Lake Pontchartrain along the north
shore extending out one and one-quarter miles from shore and running from the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1331 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 754
Southern Railway Bridge to a line drawn between a point one and one-quarter miles
southwest of Goose Point and Goose Point.
(2) There is hereby created the Manchac Wildlife Management Area
Sanctuary for fish, shrimp, and other seafood and marine life, to be comprised of that
portion of Lake Pontchartrain adjacent to and south of the Manchac Wildlife
Management Area, bounded on the north by the shoreline of said wildlife
management area, on the west by a line drawn south from the western boundary of
said wildlife management area near Pass Manchac, on the east by a line drawn south
from the boundary between the Manchac and Joyce Wildlife Management Areas, and
extending waterward into Lake Pontchartrain to a line one and one-quarter miles
from the shoreline.
B. The taking of fish, shrimp, and other seafood from the waters of the Lake
Catherine and Lake Pontchartrain Sanctuary Sanctuaries by use of trawls, skimmer
nets, butterfly nets, seines, or traps or other netting, with the exception of cast nets,
drop nets, or scoop nets, is hereby prohibited. However, nothing in this Section shall
be construed to prohibit the spearing of fish by any skin diver, operating for sport,
while submerged in the water, and using standard underwater spearing equipment.
C. The taking of legal catfish by means of legal hoop nets or legal slat traps
in the sanctuary sanctuaries is authorized. The use of crab traps in the sanctuary
sanctuaries is authorized. The use of legal trawls, skimmer nets, and butterfly nets
is authorized in open seasons in the area of the sanctuary sanctuaries located south
and east of the Interstate 10 bridge.
D. The sanctuary sanctuaries created herein shall be administered by the Fish
and Game Section of the Wildlife and Fisheries Commission or its successors.
E. Fish, shrimp, and other seafood and marine life may be caught or taken
from the waters of the sanctuary sanctuaries by any method other than those
prohibited above, including by skin divers operating for sport, while submerged in
the water, and using standard underwater spearing equipment, during the seasons and
in accordance with regulations now or hereafter prescribed by the legislature or by
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1331 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 754
the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries of the state of Louisiana appertaining to
these waters or to the other waters of the state generally.
* * *